apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="/stor__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>stor</l>      <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stort</l>     <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>store</l>     <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>store</l>     <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>større</l>    <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>størst</l>    <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>største</l>   <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ung__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>       <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungt</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unge</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unge</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngre</l>     <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngst</l>     <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngste</l>    <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sti/v__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>v</l>         <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vere</l>      <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vest</l>      <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>veste</l>     <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ti/t__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>       <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>       <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>      <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/å__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>        <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>        <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>        <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærre</l>      <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ærrest</l>      <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærreste</l>      <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="bit/ter__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tert</l>      <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rere</l>      <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rest</l>      <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>reste</l>     <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kærkom/men__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ment</l>      <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aktiv__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l> <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="amerikansk__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<e lm="få">        <i>f</i><par n="f/å__adj"/></e>
<e lm="arkitektonisk">        <i>arkitektonisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="burmesisk">        <i>burmesisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="etymologisk">        <i>etymologisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="frankisk">        <i>frankisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ghanesisk">        <i>ghanesisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hydrostatisk">        <i>hydrostatisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kinetisk">        <i>kinetisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kronologisk">        <i>kronologisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="marxistisk">        <i>marxistisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nazistisk">        <i>nazistisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="partipolitisk">        <i>partipolitisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="romantisk">        <i>romantisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skoltesamisk">        <i>skoltesamisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="syrisk">        <i>syrisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="underjordisk">        <i>underjordisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="iransk">        <i>iransk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gregoriansk">        <i>gregoriansk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="luxembourgsk">        <i>luxembourgsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="provisorisk">        <i>provisorisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="konstruktiv">        <i>konstruktiv</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stor">            <par n="/stor__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ung">             <par n="/ung__adj"/></e>
<e lm="afsindig">        <i>afsindig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="polsk">       <i>polsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="usand">           <i>usand</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="alvorlig">        <i>alvorlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="australsk">       <i>australsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bitter">          <i>bit</i><par n="bit/ter__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="flittig">         <i>flittig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fransk">          <i>fransk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="giftig">          <i>giftig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="hemmelig">        <i>hemmelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hvid">            <i>hvid</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="intim">           <i>intim</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="liberal">         <i>liberal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="misundelig">      <i>misundelig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="national">        <i>national</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="normal">          <i>normal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="offentlig">       <i>offentlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="personlig">       <i>personlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rummelig">        <i>rummelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjov">            <i>sjov</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stiv">            <i>sti</i><par n="sti/v__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sund">            <i>sund</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="synlig">          <i>synlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="systematisk">     <i>systematisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="uskyldig">        <i>uskyldig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="vanskelig">       <i>vanskelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="økonomisk">       <i>økonomisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="identisk">        <i>identisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="daglig">          <i>daglig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utaknemlig">      <i>utaknemlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="samtidig">        <i>samtidig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="godmodig">        <i>godmodig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ideal">           <i>ideal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="naiv">            <i>naiv</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="død">             <i>død</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bitter">                    <i>bit</i><par n="bit/ter__adj"/></e>
<e lm="evigung">                   <i>evig</i><par n="/ung__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kærkommen">                <i>kærkom</i><par n="kærkom/men__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mellemstor">                <i>mellem</i><par n="/stor__adj"/></e>
<e lm="omkommen">                  <i>omkom</i><par n="kærkom/men__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tit">                      <i>ti</i><par n="ti/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="velkommen">                 <i>velkom</i><par n="kærkom/men__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nyvasket" a="PT"> <i>nyvasket</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
